Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2511.01
Statewide services coordination system; development; implementation.

The lead agencies shall develop and implement a statewide services coordination system for eligible infants or toddlers with disabilities and their families pursuant to the Early Intervention Act. The amount and duration of services coordination shall be based on need, as specified on the individualized family service plan. Services coordination under the act shall not duplicate any case management services which an eligible infant or toddler with disabilities and his or her family are already receiving or eligible to receive from whatever source.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 17.